Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 15. REGULATING POLITICAL FUNDS AND CAMPAIGNS

CHAPTER 257. POLITICAL PARTIES

Sec. 257.001. PRINCIPAL POLITICAL COMMITTEE OF POLITICAL PARTY. The state or county executive committee of a political party may designate a general-purpose committee as the principal political committee for that party in the state or county, as applicable.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.19, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Sec. 257.002. REQUIREMENTS RELATING TO CORPORATE OR LABOR UNION CONTRIBUTIONS. (a) A political party that accepts a contribution authorized by Section 253.104 may use the contribution only to:

(1) defray normal overhead and administrative or operating costs incurred by the party; or

(2) administer a primary election or convention held by the party.

(b) A political party that accepts contributions authorized by Section 253.104 shall maintain the contributions in a separate account.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.19, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Sec. 257.003. REPORT REQUIRED. (a) A political party that accepts contributions authorized by Section 253.104 shall report all contributions and expenditures made to and from the account required by Section 257.002.

(b) The report must be filed with the commission and must include the information required under Section 254.031 as if the contributions or expenditures were political contributions or political expenditures.

(c) Sections 254.001 and 254.032-254.037 apply to a report required by this section as if the party chair were a campaign treasurer of a political committee and as if the contributions or expenditures were political contributions or political expenditures.

(d) The commission shall prescribe by rule reporting schedules for each primary election held by the political party and for the general election for state and county officers.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.19, eff. Jan. 1, 1992. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 251, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 257.004. RESTRICTIONS ON CONTRIBUTIONS BEFORE GENERAL ELECTION. (a) Beginning on the 60th day before the date of the general election for state and county officers and continuing through the day of the election, a political party may not knowingly accept a contribution authorized by Section 253.104 or make an expenditure from the account required by Section 257.002.

(b) A person who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.19, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Sec. 257.005. CANDIDATE FOR STATE OR COUNTY CHAIR OF POLITICAL PARTY. (a) Except as provided by this section, the following are subject to the requirements of this title that apply to a candidate for public office:

(1) a candidate for state chair of a political party with a nominee on the ballot in the most recent gubernatorial general election; and

(2) a candidate for election to the office of county chair of a political party with a nominee on the ballot in the most recent gubernatorial general election if the county has a population of 350,000 or more.

(b) A political committee that supports or opposes a candidate covered by Subsection (a) is subject to the provisions of this title that apply to any other committee that supports or opposes candidates for public office, except as provided by this section.

(c) The reporting schedules for a candidate covered by Subsection (a) or a political committee supporting or opposing the candidate shall be prescribed by commission rule.

(d) Except as provided by this section, each contribution to and expenditure by a candidate covered by Subsection (a) is subject to the same requirements of this title as a political contribution to or a political expenditure by a candidate for public office. Each contribution to and expenditure by a political committee supporting or opposing a candidate covered by Subsection (a) is subject to the same requirements of this title as a political contribution to or political expenditure by any other specific-purpose committee.

(e) Section 251.001(1) does not apply to this section.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.19, eff. Jan. 1, 1992. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 252, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 249, Sec. 2.24, 2.25, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 257.006. CRIMINAL PENALTY FOR FAILURE TO COMPLY. (a) Except as provided by Section 257.004, a person who knowingly uses a contribution in violation of Section 257.002 or who knowingly fails to otherwise comply with this chapter commits an offense.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.19, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.

Sec. 257.007. RULES. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this chapter.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 304, Sec. 5.19, eff. Jan. 1, 1992.